Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB131.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7308 of Title 44 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 7308. Maintenance of records.* * *(d) Penalties for noncompliance.--A law enforcement agency that fails to put all relevant separation records into the database in a timely manner under section 7309(d) (relating to reporting) shall be ineligible to receive State funding for equipment, hiring or overtime expenses. A noncompliant law enforcement agency that seeks State funding designated for the purpose of violence intervention, victim services or community engagement programs shall first obtain the approval of the 12345678910111213141516171819 commission.Section 2. Section 7311 of Title 44 is amended to read:§ 7311. Hiring report.(a) Information required to be reported.--If a prospective employing law enforcement agency hires an applicant whose separation records includes any of the following, the law enforcement agency shall file a report with the commission that indicates the prospective employing law enforcement agency's reasoning and rationale for hiring the applicant[:] and materially addresses why an applicant should be hired in response to each documented disciplinary action in each of the enumerated categories below. A hiring report shall be formatted so that each disciplinary action per enumerated category is required to be selected as appropriate:(1) [Final and binding disciplinary] Disciplinary action based on any of the following:(i) excessive force;(ii) harassment;(iii) theft;(iv) discrimination;(v) sexual abuse;(vi) sexual misconduct;(vii) domestic violence;(viii) coercion of a false confession;(ix) filing a false report; or[(x) a judicial finding of dishonesty.](x.1) a finding of dishonesty at any level by an authority, internal or external, including judicial, civil or administrative.(2) A criminal conviction relating to conduct described 20260HB0131PN3563 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in paragraph (1).(b) Electronic database of commission.--(1) The hiring report shall be included in the commission's electronic database.(2) The hiring report shall be on a form developed by the commission and made available on the commission's publicly accessible Internet website.(3) The Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency, the Majority Leader of the Senate, the Majority Leader of the House of Representatives, the Minority Leader of the Senate and the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives may request that the commission produce a report within five business days that documents the following information:(i) The number of agencies participating.(ii) The number of separation records added in the last 12-month period.(iii) The number of separation records containing allegations applicable in subsection (a), past and present.(iv) The number of conditional offers of employment made by the county or law enforcement agency.(v) The total number of hiring reports.(vi) The number of hiring reports submitted.(vii) The number of applicants for which hiring reports were submitted.(viii) The number of applicants rejected due to substantiated allegations, complaints or final and binding disciplinary action in the system.(ix) The number of hirings despite allegations in 20260HB0131PN3563 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 each category.(4) By January 31 each year, the commission, in coordination with the Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency, shall publish on the commission's publicly accessible Internet website an annual report reviewing the efficacy of the database on police accountability, community safety and best practices in human resources within law enforcement agencies. This report shall include:(i) The number of separation records added in the last 12 months.(ii) The number of separation records containing allegations in subsection (a).(iii) The number of hirings despite allegations in each category in subsection (a).(c) Subject to disclosure.--The hiring report shall be subject to disclosure under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(d) Public notice required prior to hiring.--A prospective employing law enforcement agency, municipality or entity that hires agents defined under State law as peace officers whose record of separation includes any of the following reasons or circumstances for separation shall issue a public notice 14 business days before the prospective employing law enforcement agency or municipality takes formal action to hire the prospective officer:(1) Substantiated allegations, substantiated complaints or completed or ongoing investigations, whether internal or external, of the use of excessive force, harassment, theft, discrimination, sexual abuse, sexual misconduct, domestic violence, coercion of a false confession, filing a false 20260HB0131PN3563 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 report or any finding of dishonesty at any level by an authority, internal or external, including judicial, civil or administrative.(2) Criminal charges related to substantiated allegations, substantiated complaints or completed or ongoing investigations, whether internal or external, of the use of excessive force, harassment, theft, discrimination, sexual abuse, sexual misconduct, domestic violence, coercion of a false confession, filing a false report or any finding of dishonesty at any level by any authority, internal or external, including judicial, civil or administrative.(e) Penalties for noncompliance.--A law enforcement agency or other entity that hires a peace officer that does not comply with the requirements of this chapter or fails to include all relevant separation records into the database in a timely manner under section 7309(d) (relating to reporting) shall be ineligible to apply or otherwise receive State grants or other incentives. Municipal, county or other governmental entities with budget authority over law enforcement or other agencies that hire peace officers within their jurisdiction shall be made ineligible for applying for or receipt of State money or tax incentives due to noncompliance with this chapter.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB0131PN3563 - 5 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223